Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 2

Selection of Candidates

2-13-201. Conditions for name being shown on ballot.

No person's name may be shown on a ballot as the nominee of a political party for the offices named in §2-13-202 or for any office to be voted on by the voters of a county, unless the political party:

Is a statewide political party or a recognized minor party; and

Has nominated the person substantially in compliance with this chapter.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1301; Acts 2011, ch. 257, § 5.

Cross-References. Affidavit of nonadvocacy of subversive policies and copy of rules required to be filed by political party, §2-1-114.

Primary election voting requirements, §2-7-115.

Results in primary elections, §§2-8-113 —2-8-115.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of requirements for ballot access by new political parties, OAG 99-121 (5/19/99).

Collateral References.

Constitutionality of candidate participation provisions for primary elections. 121 A.L.R.5th 1.

2-13-202. Offices for which candidates are chosen in primary elections.

Statewide political parties shall nominate their candidates for the following offices by vote of the members of the party in primary elections at the regular August election:

Governor;

Members of the general assembly;

United States senator; and

Members of the United States house of representatives.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1314; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 60; 2012, ch. 955, § 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 25.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of requirements for ballot access by new political parties, OAG 99-121 (5/19/99).

2-13-203. Methods of nomination for other offices.

Statewide political parties may nominate their candidates for any office other than those listed in § 2-13-202 by any method authorized under the rules of the party or by primary election under this title.

Recognized minor parties may nominate their candidates for any office by any method authorized under the rules of the party or by primary election under this title.

Persons nominated other than by primary method for offices to be filled by the voters of one (1) county or any part of a county shall be immediately certified by the chair of the nominating body to the county election commission by the qualifying deadlines.

Persons nominated other than by primary method for offices to be filled by the voters of more than one (1) county, for state or federal office or for statewide office, shall be immediately certified to the coordinator of elections by the chair of the nominating body. The coordinator of elections shall thereafter certify such nominees to the county election commissions in each county in which the nominees are candidates by the qualifying deadline.

Notwithstanding subsection (c), in the years in which an election will be held for president of the United States, the chair of the nominating body of a statewide political party or recognized minor party shall certify the party's nominees for president and vice president for the November general election to the coordinator of elections by the first business day in September.

If a statewide political party decides to nominate by primary election under this section, the county executive committee shall, at least one hundred eighty (180) days before the qualifying deadline, direct, in writing, the county election commission of each county whose voters are entitled to vote to fill the office to hold the election. If the one hundred eightieth day falls on a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, the deadline shall be the next regular business day. The county executive committee may revoke or rescind its decision to nominate by primary election by providing the county election commission with written notice not less than ninety (90) days before the qualifying deadline.

If a nonrecognized minor party seeking recognition as a recognized minor party decides to nominate by primary election under this section, the officers of the nonrecognized minor party shall file a notice with the coordinator of elections of its intent to nominate by primary election by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, by the qualifying deadline established in subdivision (d)(1). The notice shall be in writing and shall be signed by two (2) officers with authority to act for the party. The notice shall be notarized and contain the following statement:

We , and , officers of the Party certify under penalty of perjury that we are authorized to act for the Party.

Primaries, if any, for nominating candidates for any office which will appear on the regular August election ballot shall be held on the first Tuesday in May before the August election. In the years in which an election will be held for president of the United States, a political party primary for offices to be elected in the regular August election may be held on the same day as the presidential preference primary. In such event, the qualifying deadline for candidates and for delegate-candidates shall be twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the date established in § 2-5-101(a)(2).

Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any other law to the contrary, by resolution adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of any county having a population in excess of eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the county legislative body may require that all elections to fill state trial court judgeships and county judicial offices in such county shall be conducted in a nonpartisan manner.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1976, ch. 439, § 2; 1977, ch. 316, § 2; 1977, ch. 480, § 8; 1978, ch. 754, § 14; T.C.A., § 2-1315; Acts 1983, ch. 134, § 1; 1986, ch. 562, § 19; 1991, ch. 127, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 87, § 3; 1997, ch. 559, § 1; 2000, ch. 756, § 15; 2003, ch. 374, § 4; 2006, ch. 642, § 5; 2012, ch. 955, §§ 6-8; 2012, ch. 1101, § 9; 2014, ch. 810, § 1; 2020, ch. 648, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment, in (d)(1), substituted “one hundred eighty (180) days” for “ninety (90) days” in the first sentence, substituted “one hundred eightieth day” for “ninety (90) day” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2020 amendment added (d) and redesignated the following subsections accordingly.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 810, § 2. April 25, 2014.

Acts 2020, ch. 648, § 2. April 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Noninstructional public school personnel eligible to run for public office, §49-5-301.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 25.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Qualifying deadlines, constitutionality, OAG 88-42 (2/29/88).

Nonpartisan judicial elections in Shelby County, constitutionality, OAG 97-094 (62/26/97).

Nonpartisan judicial elections in Shelby County, meaning of “county judicial offices,” OAG 97-094 (62/26/97).

Constitutionality of private act requiring nonpartisan elections for county mayor and members of the county legislative body, OAG 08-191 (12/29/08).

2-13-204. Withdrawal or death of candidate — New nomination.

If a political party's candidate for any office dies or withdraws because of military call-up for the draft, or physical or mental disability, such physical or mental disability being properly documented by competent medical authority, or is forced to change residence by the candidate's employer for a job-related reason, or is declared ineligible or disqualified by a court, a new nomination may be made by the former nominee's party by any method of nomination authorized by § 2-13-203. A political party's candidate may withdraw for reasons other than those stated in the preceding sentence, but the political party may make no further nomination for the position in question.

If the office is to be filled by the voters of the entire state, the party's state executive committee shall determine the method of nomination.

If the office is to be filled by the voters of more than one (1) county, the party's chairs of its county executive committees in those counties whose voters will fill the office shall form a committee to determine the method of nomination. However, if the office to be filled is for the house of representatives of the United States congress in a district which consists of more than one (1) county, the chair of the congressional district's convention for that political party shall convene a convention in accordance with the party's rules within fourteen (14) days of the date of the vacancy to determine the method of nomination.

If the office is to be filled by the voters of one (1) county, the party's county executive committee shall determine the method of nomination.

If the office to be filled is a seat in the general assembly, then it shall be filled by the members of the party's county executive committee who reside within that district, except that in counties having a metropolitan form of government with a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, then the office shall be filled by the members of the party's county executive committee who represent precincts within that district. In a county with two (2) or more districts, only members of the county executive committee who reside within a particular district shall determine the method of nomination in that district except that in counties having a metropolitan form of government with a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, only members of the party's county executive committee who represent precincts within that district shall determine the method of nomination in that district. If no member of the county executive committee resides within a district, then the members of the county executive committees who represent precincts within the district may nominate a candidate. The chair of the county executive committee of the residence of the former nominee shall call a joint convention for the purpose of selecting a new nominee as herein provided within ten (10) days of the date the vacancy occurred. In counties where the members of the county executive committee are selected at large, the full executive committee shall determine the method of nomination.

In counties having a metropolitan form of government the proper county political party executive committee shall meet to choose the party's new nominee.

No later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon prevailing time on the fortieth day before the election, the chair of the party's state executive committee shall file with the county election commission of each county in which the nominee is a candidate a written statement of their name of the new nominee. If any of the events allowing a new nomination occur within ten (10) days of the fortieth day, the time for making a new nomination shall be twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time on the tenth day following the death or withdrawal.

If a candidate for the general assembly is elected to a local public office where the charter or law governing the local election prohibits the person from holding a state office and a local office simultaneously, then the candidate shall have the candidate's name removed from the ballot as a candidate for election to the general assembly, if the candidate files a written request with the county election commission requesting the candidate's name be removed at least fifty (50) calendar days prior to the election for the general assembly. Nomination for a new candidate may be made by the former candidate's party by any method of nomination authorized by § 2-13-203.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974, ch. 660, § 1; 1976, ch. 669, §§ 1-3; 1977, ch. 480, § 2; 1978, ch. 754, § 2; 1979, ch. 306, §§ 14, 18-20; T.C.A., § 2-511(a), (b); Acts 1981, ch. 392, § 1; 1997, ch. 558, § 3; 1999, ch. 6, §§ 4, 5; 2006, ch. 965, § 3; 2015, ch. 484, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the first two sentences in (b)(4), which read: “If the office to be filled is a seat in the general assembly, it shall be filled by the members of the party's county executive committee who represent precincts within that district. In a county with two (2) or more districts, only members of the county executive committee who represent precincts in a particular district shall determine the method of nomination in that district.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 484, § 3. May 20, 2015.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Where a candidate is elected to the general assembly and immediately resigns from his or her local office, a successor would be elected by the qualified voters of the district in which the vacancy occurred, OAG 06-137 (8/28/06).

T.C.A. §2-13-204(d) does not mandate, that a candidate must submit a request to have his or her name removed from the ballot as a candidate for the general assembly, OAG 06-137 (8/28/06).

Procedures for filling a vacancy in the state senate. OAG 14-78, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 80 (8/27/14).

2-13-205. Presidential preference primaries — Date of election — Failure to have candidate's name on ballot.

On the first Tuesday in March before presidential electors are elected, a presidential preference primary shall be held for each statewide political party. If no candidate will appear on the presidential preference primary ballot of a political party under §2-5-205, no presidential preference primary shall be held for that political party.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1976, ch. 439, § 3; 1977, ch. 316, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-1316; Acts 1986, ch. 562, § 5; 2003, ch. 374, § 2; 2007, ch. 71, § 1; 2011, ch. 182, §§ 3, 6.

Cross-References. Election of delegates to national convention, §2-13-302.

2-13-206. County primary elections in metropolitan form of government — Costs.

All counties in the state which have a metropolitan form of government shall bear the expense of holding county primary elections for those political parties qualified under this chapter.

Acts 1973, ch. 363, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1324.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 25.

2-13-207. Filing fees for such elections.

The city council of any such metropolitan government may set any reasonable filing fees up to five hundred dollars ($500).

Acts 1973, ch. 363, § 2; T.C.A., § 2-1325.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 25.

2-13-208. Municipal elections to be nonpartisan.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this part, municipal elections shall be nonpartisan. Municipal elections shall not require candidates to be nominated by political parties unless the municipality's charter specifically permits partisan elections. When a municipality's charter allows partisan elections, political parties may nominate candidates for municipal office by using the primary election provisions of this title or as otherwise authorized by the rules of the party.

In any county having a metropolitan form of government, the election of the county mayor and the members of the legislative body of such metropolitan government shall be considered to be municipal elections within the meaning of this section; however, this section shall not be construed to require a partisan election for any other officers of the metropolitan government if the charter of such metropolitan government provides that elections for such officers shall be nonpartisan.

Acts 1993, ch. 89, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.